Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 5. Intake, Petition and Notice.
§ 16.1-262.
Form and content of petition.

The petition shall contain the facts below indicated:

Click to view

Statement of name, age, date of birth, if known, and residence of the child.

Statement of names and residence of his parents, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis and spouse, if any.

Statement of names and residence of the nearest known relatives if no parent or guardian can be found.

Statement of the specific facts which allegedly bring the child within the purview of this law. If the petition alleges a delinquent act, it shall make reference to the applicable sections of the Code which designate the act a crime.

Statement as to whether the child is in custody, and if so, the place of detention or shelter care, and the time the child was taken into custody, and the time the child was placed in detention or shelter care.

If the subject of the petition is an adult, the petition shall not state or include the name of or any information concerning the parents, guardians, legal custodian, or person standing in loco parentis of the adult subject of the petition except as may be necessary to state the conduct alleged in the petition.

If any of the facts herein required to be stated are not known by the petitioner, the petition shall so state. The petition shall be verified, except that petitions filed under §

63.2-1237

may be signed by the petitioner’s counsel, and may be upon information.In accordance with §

16.1-69.32

, the Supreme Court may formulate rules for the form and content of petitions in the juvenile court concerning matters related to the custody, visitation or support of a child and the protection, support or maintenance of an adult where the provisions of this section are not appropriate.

“Commonwealth of Virginia, In re (name of child)” a child under eighteen years of age. “In the Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court of the county (or city) of ”

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-165; 1956, c. 555; 1977, c. 559; 1979, c. 615; 1984, c. 631; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 2000, c. 830; 2016, c. 626.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 830 substituted “§ 63.1-219.44” for “§ 63.1-220.3” in the next-to-last paragraph.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 626 designated the formerly undesignated first paragraph as
subsection A and the formerly undesignated last two paragraphs as subsection C, and added subsection B.

§ 16.1-263.
Summonses.

After a petition has been filed, the court shall direct the issuance of summonses, one directed to the juvenile, if the juvenile is twelve or more years of age, and another to at least one parent, guardian, legal custodian, or other person standing in loco parentis, and such other persons as appear to the court to be proper or necessary parties to the proceedings.After a petition has been filed against an adult pursuant to subsection C or D of §

16.1-259

, the court shall direct the issuance of a summons against the adult.The summons shall require them to appear personally before the court at the time fixed to answer or testify as to the allegations of the petition. Where the custodian is summoned and such person is not a parent of the juvenile in question, a parent shall also be served with a summons. The court may direct that other proper or necessary parties to the proceedings be notified of the pendency of the case, the charge and the time and place for the hearing.Any such summons shall be deemed a mandate of the court, and willful failure to obey its requirements shall subject any person guilty thereof to liability for punishment for contempt. Upon the failure of any person to appear as ordered in the summons, the court shall immediately issue an order for such person to show cause why he should not be held in contempt.The parent, guardian, legal custodian, or other person standing in loco parentis shall not be summoned to appear or be punished for failure to appear in cases of adults who are brought before the court pursuant to subsection C or D of §

16.1-259

unless such person is summoned as a witness.

The summons shall advise the parties of their right to counsel as provided in §

16.1-266

. A copy of the petition shall accompany each summons for the initial proceedings. The summons shall include notice that in the event that the juvenile is committed to the Department or to a secure local facility, at least one parent or other person legally obligated to care for and support the juvenile may be required to pay a reasonable sum for treatment of the juvenile pursuant to §

16.1-290

. Notice of subsequent proceedings shall be provided to all parties in interest. In all cases where a party is represented by counsel and counsel has been provided with a copy of the petition and due notice as to time, date, and place of the hearing, such action shall be deemed due notice to such party, unless such counsel has notified the court that he no longer represents such party.

The judge may endorse upon the summons an order directing a parent or parents, guardian, or other custodian having the custody or control of the juvenile to bring the juvenile to the hearing.

A party, other than the juvenile, may waive service of summons by written stipulation or by voluntary appearance at the hearing.

No such summons or notification shall be required if the judge shall certify on the record that (i) the identity of a parent or guardian is not reasonably ascertainable or (ii) in cases in which it is alleged that a juvenile has committed a delinquent act, crime, status offense, or traffic infraction or is in need of services or supervision, the location, or in the case of a parent or guardian located outside of the Commonwealth the location or mailing address, of a parent or guardian is not reasonably ascertainable. An affidavit of the mother that the identity of the father is not reasonably ascertainable shall be sufficient evidence of this fact, provided there is no other evidence before the court which would refute such an affidavit. In cases referred to in clause (ii), an affidavit of a law-enforcement officer or juvenile probation officer that the location of a parent or guardian is not reasonably ascertainable shall be sufficient evidence of this fact, provided that there is no other evidence before the court which would refute the affidavit.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 16.1-166, 16.1-172; 1956, c. 555; 1974, c. 620; 1975, c. 128; 1977, c. 559; 1978, cc. 613, 740; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 1997, c. 441; 1999, c. 952; 2004, c. 573; 2016, c. 626; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 283.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts
1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts
1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and substituted “juvenile” for “child” throughout the section and added the present second sentence of subsection B.

The 1999 amendment,

in subsection A, substituted “at least one parent” for “the parents” in the first sentence, and in the third sentence, substituted “a parent” for “the parent” twice; substituted “at least one parent” for “the parent” in the third sentence of subsection B; and substituted “a parent or parents” for “the parents” in subsection C.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 573 added the last paragraph in subsection A.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 626, in subsection A, added the second and last paragraphs.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, c. 283, effective July 1, 2021, deleted “support and” preceding “treatment of the juvenile” in the third sentence in subsection B.

Law Review.

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

For 2000 survey of Virginia criminal law and procedure, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 749 (2000).

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles, §§ 82, 84, 85.

§ 16.1-264.
Service of summons; proof of service; penalty.

If a party designated in subsection A of §

16.1-263

to be served with a summons can be found within the Commonwealth, the summons shall be served upon him in person or by substituted service as prescribed in subdivision 2 of §

8.01-296

.If a party designated to be served in §

16.1-263

is without the Commonwealth but can be found or his address is known, or can with reasonable diligence be ascertained, service of summons may be made either by delivering a copy thereof to him personally or by mailing a copy thereof to him by certified mail return receipt requested.If after reasonable effort a party other than the person who is the subject of the petition cannot be found or his post-office address cannot be ascertained, whether he is within or without the Commonwealth, the court may order service of the summons upon him by publication in accordance with the provisions of §§

8.01-316

and

8.01-317

.

Service of summons may be made under the direction of the court by sheriffs, their deputies and police officers in counties and cities or by any other suitable person designated by the court. However, in any case in which custody or visitation of a minor child or children is at issue and a summons is issued for the attendance and testimony of a teacher or other school personnel who is not a party to the proceeding, if such summons is served on school property, it shall be served only by a sheriff or his deputy.

Proof of service may be made by the affidavit of the person other than an officer designated in subsection B hereof who delivers a copy of the summons to the person summoned, but if served by a state, county or municipal officer his return shall be sufficient without oath.

The summons shall be considered a mandate of the court and willful failure to obey its requirements shall subject any person guilty thereof to liability for punishment as for contempt.

A1.

Any person who is subject to an emergency protective order issued pursuant to §

16.1-253.4

or

19.2-152.8

shall have been personally served with the protective order if a law-enforcement officer, as defined in §

9.1-101

, personally provides to such person a notification of the issuance of the order, which shall be on a form approved by the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia, provided that all of the information and individual requirements of the order are included on the form. The officer making service shall enter or cause to be entered the date and time of service and other appropriate information required by the Department of State Police into the Virginia Criminal Information Network and make due return to the court.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 16.1-167 to 16.1-170; 1956, c. 555; 1977, c. 559; 1984, c. 594; 1987, c. 632; 1991, c. 62; 2004, c. 588; 2011, c. 482.

Cross references.

As to the Court-Appointed Special Advocate Program and notice of hearings and proceedings, see §

9.1-155

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 588 added the last sentence in subsection B and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 482 made a minor stylistic change in the first paragraph in subsection A; and added subsection A1.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles, § 85, 14A M.J. Parent and Child, § 19.

§ 16.1-265.
Subpoena; attorney-issued subpoena.

Upon application of a party and pursuant to the rules of the Supreme Court of Virginia for the issuance of subpoenas, the clerk of the court shall issue, and the court on its own motion may issue, subpoenas requiring attendance and testimony of witnesses and production of records, documents or other tangible objects at any hearing.

Subpoenas duces tecum for medical records shall be subject to the provisions of §§

8.01-413

and

32.1-127.1:03

except that no separate fee shall be imposed. A subpoena may also be issued in a civil proceeding by an attorney-at-law who is an active member of the Virginia State Bar at the time of issuance, as an officer of the court. Any such subpoena shall be on a form approved by the Committee on District Courts, signed by the attorney as if a pleading and shall include the attorney’s address. A copy, together with the attorney’s certificate of service pursuant to Rule 1:12, shall be mailed or delivered to the clerk’s office of the court in which the case is pending on the day of issuance by the attorney. The law governing subpoenas issued by a clerk shall apply mutatis mutandis, except that attorneys may not issue subpoenas in those cases in which they may not issue a summons as provided in §

8.01-407

. When an attorney-at-law transmits one or more subpoenas or subpoenas duces tecum to a sheriff to be served in his jurisdiction, the provisions in §

8.01-407

regarding such transmittals shall apply. A sheriff shall not be required to serve an attorney-issued subpoena that is not issued at least five business days prior to the date production of evidence is required.

If the time for compliance with a subpoena issued by an attorney is less than 14 days after service of the subpoena, the person to whom it is directed may serve upon the party issuing the subpoena a written objection setting forth any grounds therefor. If objection is made, the party on whose behalf the subpoena was issued and served shall not be entitled to compliance, except pursuant to an order of the court, but may, upon notice to the person to whom the subpoena was directed, move for an order to compel compliance. Upon such timely motion, the court may quash, modify or sustain the subpoena.

History.

1977, c. 559; 2000, c. 813; 2004, c. 335.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, cc. 514 and 551, repealed Acts 2000, c. 813, cl. 2, which had provided: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2001, unless reenacted by the 2001 General Assembly. Any subpoena or subpoena duces tecum issued by an attorney in compliance with this act shall remain valid notwithstanding the expiration of this act.”

Acts 2000, c. 813, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Bar Association, with the support of the Virginia Sheriffs Association and such other organizations from which it may request assistance, shall conduct a study of the effectiveness of this act and report its findings to the General Assembly no later than January 1, 2001.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 813 added the second and third paragraphs.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 335, in the second paragraph, deleted “and may not issue a subpoena duces tecum less than five business days prior to the date that production of evidence is required” following “§

8.01-407

” and added the last sentence; and substituted “14” for “fourteen” in the first sentence of the last paragraph.

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of civil practice and procedure, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 87 (2004).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 2-1401 Subpoena for Witness in District Court, et seq.